Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-5] Nursing facility sustainability fee.
(a) Effective July 1, 2012, the department shall charge and collect a provider
fee on health care items or services provided by nursing facilities.

(b) The nursing [facility] sustainability fee
shall be based on the net patient service revenue of all nursing facilities
that are subject to the sustainability fee, as determined by the department.

(c) The nursing facility sustainability fee
shall not exceed four per cent of net patient service revenue and shall be
calculated and paid on a per resident day basis, unless the facility qualifies
for an exemption identified in subsection (d)(1). The per resident daily fee
shall be $13.46 for each affected facility, except for facilities described in
subsection (d)(2), which instead shall pay a per resident daily fee of $5.85.

(d) In accordance with the redistribution
method set forth in title 42 Code of Federal Regulations section
433.68(e)(1) and (2), the department shall seek a waiver of the
broad-based and uniformity provider fee requirements under federal law from
which to exclude certain nursing facilities and to permit certain high volume
medicaid nursing facilities or facilities with a high number of total annual
patient days to pay the sustainability fee at a lesser amount per resident day,
as follows:

(1) The department shall exempt the following nursing
facility providers from the nursing facility sustainability fee subject to
federal approval under title 42 Code of Federal Regulations section 433.68(e)(2):

(A) Nursing facilities with twenty-eight or
fewer licensed beds;

(B) Nursing facilities owned or operated by
the Hawaii health systems corporation; and

(C) Continuing care retirement communities.

(2) The department shall reduce the fee for high
volume medicaid nursing facilities or facilities with high patient volumes in
order to meet the redistributive tests of title 42 Code of Federal Regulations
section 433.68(e)(2).

(3) The department, with agreement by the nursing
facility trade associations located in Hawaii, may modify, add to, or reduce
the categories of facilities exempt from the assessment if necessary to obtain
and maintain approval of the waiver by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services, if the modification is consistent with the purposes of this chapter.
[L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 142, §3; am L 2014, c 124, §2; am L
2015, c 69, §§1(2), 2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next